Texas statutes.
ELECTION CODE

TITLE 2. VOTER QUALIFICATIONS AND REGISTRATION

CHAPTER 14. RENEWAL OF REGISTRATION

SUBCHAPTER A. ISSUANCE OF RENEWAL CERTIFICATE

Sec. 14.001. RENEWAL REGISTRATION CERTIFICATE. (a) On or after November 15 but before December 6 of each odd-numbered year, the registrar shall issue a voter registration certificate to each voter in the county whose registration is effective on the preceding November 14 and whose name does not appear on the suspense list.

(b) In this code, "renewal certificate" means a registration certificate issued under this section.

(c) A renewal certificate is valid for two years beginning on January 1 following its issuance.

(d) At the time the registrar issues an initial certificate for a voter whose registration will be effective after November 14 of an odd-numbered year and before January 1 of the following year, the registrar shall also issue the voter a renewal certificate.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1986, 69th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 14, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 436, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 472, Sec. 54, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 14.002. DELIVERY OF RENEWAL CERTIFICATE TO VOTER. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (d), the registrar shall deliver a voter's renewal certificate by mail to the mailing address on the voter's registration application.

(b) The certificate, if mailed without an envelope, or the envelope containing the certificate must contain an instruction to the postal authorities not to forward it to any other address and to return it to the registrar if the addressee is no longer at the address to which the certificate was mailed.

(c) The registrar may not mail the certificate in the same envelope with a tax statement.

(d) The registrar shall deliver a renewal certificate issued under Section 14.001(d) with the voter's initial certificate.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

SUBCHAPTER B. RETURN OF RENEWAL CERTIFICATE

Sec. 14.021. DISPOSITION OF RETURNED RENEWAL CERTIFICATE. On the return to the registrar of an undelivered renewal certificate that was mailed to a voter, the registrar shall file the certificate with the voter's registration application and, not later than January 2 following the mailing of certificates, enter the voter's name on the suspense list.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Renumbered from Election Code Sec. 14.022 and amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 14.022. ERRONEOUS RETURN OF RENEWAL CERTIFICATE. If the registrar determines that a voter's renewal certificate was returned undelivered solely because of postal service error, address reclassification, or the registrar's clerical error, the registrar shall delete the voter's name from the suspense list, make any other appropriate corrections in the registration records, and deliver the certificate to the voter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Renumbered from Election Code Sec. 14.023 and amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 14.023. CONFIRMATION NOTICE AFTER RETURN OF RENEWAL CERTIFICATE. (a) After January 1 but not later than March 1 of each even-numbered year, the registrar shall deliver a confirmation notice in accordance with Section 15.051 to each voter whose name appears on the suspense list under this subchapter.

(b) If the voter fails to submit a response to the registrar in accordance with Section 15.053, the voter's name remains on the suspense list.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 5.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.